Washington statutes.
RCW 10.25.065

Perjury outside the state.

Perjury committed outside of the state of Washington in a statement, declaration, verification, or certificate authorized by chapter 5.50 RCW is punishable in the county in this state in which occurs the act, transaction, matter, action, or proceeding, in relation to which the statement, declaration, verification, or certification was given or made.

[ 2019 c 232 s 11; 1981 c 187 s 4.]